src/fst/clitics.lexc
!! !!!Clitics

!! The Erzya language clitics...


! ======= !
! Clitics !
! ======= !

LEXICON K-lak
+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Orth/SH+Clt/Add:%>KLossГ1ак ENDLEX ;
!+Use/NG+Err/Orth+Orth/SH+Clt/AddGak:%>KLossГ1ак ENDLEX ;
 K ;

LEXICON K
 FOC-PCLE-OR-NOT ;
@R.POS.N@  NounEnd ; !2013-04-18
@R.POS.V@  VerbEnd ; !2013-04-18

LEXICON Ks
@R.KLOSS.ON@+Use/NG+Err/Orth:@R.KLOSS.ON@%>ак ENDLEX ;
 FOC-PCLE-OR-NOT ;



LEXICON FOC-PCLE-OR-NOT
            ENDLEX ; 
+Clt/Add:%>Г1ак ENDLEX ;
!+Clt/AddGak:%>Г1ак ENDLEX ;



!! END 

LEXICON ENDLEX
 # ;




! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
